Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2114
Funds; deposit.

No corporation organized under the provisions of sections 21-2101 to 21-2117 shall at any time be authorized to receive money on deposit. The corporation shall not deposit any of its funds in any banking institution unless such institution has been designated as a depository by a vote of a majority of the directors present at an authorized meeting of the board of directors, exclusive of any director who is an officer or director of the depository so designated.

Laws 1967, c. 100, § 14, p. 308.